Utah statutes.
57-8-32.   Sale of property.

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration or bylaws, and notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 57-8-30 and 57-8-31, the unit owners may, by an affirmative vote of at least three-fourths of such unit owners, at a meeting of unit owners duly called for such purpose, elect to sell or otherwise dispose of the property. Such action shall be binding upon all unit owners and it shall thereupon become the duty of every unit owner to execute and deliver such instruments and to perform all acts as in manner and form may be necessary to effect the sale.

